Utah statutes.
53-3-212.   Owner giving permission and minor liable for damages caused by minor driving a motor vehicle.

(1) (a)  The owner of a motor vehicle causing or knowingly permitting a person younger than 18 years of age to drive the motor vehicle on a highway, or a person who gives or furnishes a motor vehicle to the minor, are each jointly and severally liable with the minor for any damages caused by the negligence of the minor in driving the motor vehicle.

(b)  If owner's or operator's security covering the minor's operation of the motor vehicle is in effect in amounts as required under Section 31A-22-304, the owner of the motor vehicle or the person who gave or furnished the motor vehicle to the minor under Subsection (1) is not subject to the liability imposed under Subsection (1).

(2)  Nothing under Subsection (1) prohibits a cause of action for any direct negligence on the part of the person furnishing the motor vehicle to the minor.

(3)  This liability provision is in addition to the liability provisions in Section 53-3-211.



Amended by Chapter 86, 2010 General Session

